Washington statutes.
RCW 39.108.130

Limitations on local infrastructure project areas.

The designation of any local infrastructure project area is subject to the following limitations:

(1) A local infrastructure project area is limited to contiguous tracts, lots, pieces, or parcels of land without the creation of islands of territory not included in the local infrastructure project area;

(2) The public improvements to be financed with local infrastructure project financing must be located in the local infrastructure project area and must, in the determination of the sponsoring city, further the intent of this chapter;

(3) Local infrastructure project areas created by a sponsoring city may not comprise an area containing more than twenty-five percent of the total assessed value of taxable property within the sponsoring city at the time the local infrastructure project areas are created;

(4) The boundaries of each local infrastructure project area may not overlap and may not be changed during the time period that local infrastructure project financing is used within the local infrastructure project area, as provided under this chapter; and

(5) All local infrastructure project areas created by the sponsoring city must comprise, in the aggregate, an area that the sponsoring city determines (a) is sufficient to use the sponsoring city specified portion, unless the sponsoring city satisfies its sponsoring city allocated share under RCW 39.108.090(1)(b)(ii), and (b) is no larger than reasonably necessary to use the sponsoring city specified portion in projected future developments.

[ 2011 c 318 s 602.]

NOTES:

Rules—2011 c 318: See note following RCW 39.108.005.